Florida, session 2026, SB962.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (n) of subsection (7) of section 12 125.01055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 125.01055âAffordable housing.â 14 (7) 15 (n)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 16 1.ââCommercial useâ means activities associated with the 17 sale, rental, or distribution of products or the performance of 18 services related thereto. The term includes, but is not limited 19 to, such uses or activities as retail sales; wholesale sales; 20 rentals of equipment, goods, or products; offices; restaurants; 21 public lodging establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(a); 22 food service vendors; sports arenas; theaters; tourist 23 attractions; and other for-profit business activities. A parcel 24 zoned to permit such uses by right without the requirement to 25 obtain a variance or waiver is considered commercial use for the 26 purposes of this section, irrespective of the local land 27 development regulationâs listed category or title. The term does 28 not include home-based businesses or cottage food operations 29 undertaken on residential property;, public lodging 30 establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(c); farms or farm 31 operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or uses associated 32 therewith, including the packaging and sale of products raised 33 on the premises;, or uses that are accessory, ancillary, 34 incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on a temporary 35 basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses, tennis courts, 36 swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area designated for 37 residential use are not commercial use, irrespective of how they 38 are operated. 39 2.ââIndustrial useâ means activities associated with the 40 manufacture, assembly, processing, or storage of products or the 41 performance of services related thereto. The term includes, but 42 is not limited to, such uses or activities as automobile 43 manufacturing or repair, boat manufacturing or repair, junk 44 yards, meat packing facilities, citrus processing and packing 45 facilities, produce processing and packing facilities, 46 electrical generating plants, water treatment plants, sewage 47 treatment plants, and solid waste disposal sites. A parcel zoned 48 to permit such uses by right without the requirement to obtain a 49 variance or waiver is considered industrial use for the purposes 50 of this section, irrespective of the local land development 51 regulationâs listed category or title. The term does not include 52 farms or farm operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or uses 53 associated therewith, including the packaging and sale of 54 products raised on the premises, or uses that are accessory, 55 ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on 56 a temporary basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses, 57 tennis courts, swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area 58 designated for residential use are not industrial use, 59 irrespective of how they are operated. 60 3.ââMixed useâ means any use that combines multiple types 61 of approved land uses from at least two of the residential use, 62 commercial use, and industrial use categories. The term does not 63 include farms or farm operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or 64 uses associated therewith, including the packaging and sale of 65 products raised on the premises, or uses that are accessory, 66 ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on 67 a temporary basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses, 68 tennis courts, swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area 69 designated for residential use are not mixed use, irrespective 70 of how they are operated. 71 4.ââPlanned unit developmentâ has the same meaning as 72 provided in s. 163.3202(5)(b). 73 Section 2.âParagraph (n) of subsection (7) of section 74 166.04151, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 75 166.04151âAffordable housing.â 76 (7) 77 (n)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 78 1.ââCommercial useâ means activities associated with the 79 sale, rental, or distribution of products or the performance of 80 services related thereto. The term includes, but is not limited 81 to, such uses or activities as retail sales; wholesale sales; 82 rentals of equipment, goods, or products; offices; restaurants; 83 public lodging establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(a); 84 food service vendors; sports arenas; theaters; tourist 85 attractions; and other for-profit business activities. A parcel 86 zoned to permit such uses by right without the requirement to 87 obtain a variance or waiver is considered commercial use for the 88 purposes of this section, irrespective of the local land 89 development regulationâs listed category or title. The term does 90 not include home-based businesses or cottage food operations 91 undertaken on residential property;, public lodging 92 establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(c); farms or farm 93 operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or uses associated 94 therewith, including the packaging and sale of products raised 95 on the premises;, or uses that are accessory, ancillary, 96 incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on a temporary 97 basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses, tennis courts, 98 swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area designated for 99 residential use are not commercial use, irrespective of how they 100 are operated. 101 2.ââIndustrial useâ means activities associated with the 102 manufacture, assembly, processing, or storage of products or the 103 performance of services related thereto. The term includes, but 104 is not limited to, such uses or activities as automobile 105 manufacturing or repair, boat manufacturing or repair, junk 106 yards, meat packing facilities, citrus processing and packing 107 facilities, produce processing and packing facilities, 108 electrical generating plants, water treatment plants, sewage 109 treatment plants, and solid waste disposal sites. A parcel zoned 110 to permit such uses by right without the requirement to obtain a 111 variance or waiver is considered industrial use for the purposes 112 of this section, irrespective of the local land development 113 regulationâs listed category or title. The term does not include 114 farms or farm operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or uses 115 associated therewith, including the packaging and sale of 116 products raised on the premises, or uses that are accessory, 117 ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on 118 a temporary basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses, 119 tennis courts, swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area 120 designated for residential use are not industrial use, 121 irrespective of how they are operated. 122 3.ââMixed useâ means any use that combines multiple types 123 of approved land uses from at least two of the residential use, 124 commercial use, and industrial use categories. The term does not 125 include farms or farm operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or 126 uses associated therewith, including the packaging and sale of 127 products raised on the premises, or uses that are accessory, 128 ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on 129 a temporary basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses, 130 tennis courts, swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area 131 designated for residential use are not mixed use, irrespective 132 of how they are operated. 133 4.ââPlanned unit developmentâ has the same meaning as 134 provided in s. 163.3202(5)(b). 135 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.